src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-labdub_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - labdub: # Verb pg 207 'eng see sm' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     labdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcSg1: ʔulabdubš # saw me
     labdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcSg2: ʔulabdubicid # saw you Sg
     labdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcSP3: ʔulabdxʷ # saw him/her/it/them
     labdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcPl1: ʔulabdubuɬ # saw us
     labdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcPl2: ʔulabdubuɬəd # saw you (guys)
# Deverbal noun
#     labdub+V+TV+OcSg1+Der/s+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: adslabdubš # your seeing of me
     labdub+V+TV+OcSg2+Der/s+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: dslabdubicid # my seeing of you Sg
#     labdub+V+TV+OcSP3+Der/s+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: dslabdxʷ # my seeing of him/her/it/them
#     labdub+V+TV+OcSP3+Der/s+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: adslabdxʷ # my seeing of him/her/it/them
#     labdub+V+TV+OcPl1+Der/s+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: adslabdubuɬ # your seeing of us
#     labdub+V+TV+OcPl2+Der/s+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: dslabdubuɬəd # my seeing of you (guys)
